Maryland, session 2026, HB1162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
9–603.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1162*

HOUSE BILL 1162
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the requirements under this
section shall apply to:
(i) local detention centers in the following counties by January 1,
2020:
1. Howard County;
2. Montgomery County;
3. Prince George’s County; and
4. St. Mary’s County; and
(ii) local detention centers in six additional counties by October 1,
2021.
(2) (i) The Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention and Policy, the
Maryland Department of Health, and the Maryland Correctional Administrators
Association shall evaluate the implementation of the requirements of this section and
determine a schedule to add additional counties, provided that the provisions of this section
shall apply to all local detention centers and the Baltimore Pre–trial Complex by January
2023.
(ii) If the Baltimore Pre–trial Complex has not fully implemented
the provisions of this section by January 2023, the Department of Public Safety and
Correctional Services shall report to the Senate Finance Committee and the House
Judiciary Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the
status and timeline of implementation.
(iii) Funding for the program at the Baltimore Pre–trial Complex
shall be as provided in the State budget.
(b) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Health care practitioner” means an individual who is licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized to practice under the Health Occupations Article.
(3) “Incarcerated individual” means an individual confined within a local
correctional facility.
(4) “Medication” means a medication approved by the federal Food and
Drug Administration for the treatment of opioid use disorder.
(5) “Medication–assisted treatment” means the use of medication, in
combination with counseling and behavioral health therapies, to provide a holistic
approach to the treatment of opioid use disorder.

HOUSE BILL 1162 3
(6) “Opioid use disorder” means a medically diagnosed problematic pattern
of opioid use that causes significant impairment or distress.
(7) “Peer recovery specialist” means an individual who has been certified
by an entity approved by the Maryland Department of Health for the purpose of providing
peer support services, as defined under § 7.5–101(n) of the Health – General Article.
(c) An incarcerated individual in a State or local correctional facility shall be
placed on a properly supervised program of methadone detoxification if:
(1) a physician determines that the incarcerated individual is a person
with an opioid use disorder;
(2) the treatment is prescribed by a physician; and
(3) the incarcerated individual consents in writing to the treatment.
(d) (1) Each local correctional facility shall conduct an assessment of the
mental health and substance use status of each incarcerated individual using
evidence–based screenings and assessments, to determine:
(i) if the medical diagnosis of an opioid use disorder is appropriate;
and
(ii) if medication–assisted treatment is appropriate.
(2) If an assessment conducted under paragraph (1) of this subsection
indicates opioid use disorder, an evaluation of the incarcerated individual shall be
conducted by a health care practitioner with prescriptive authority authorized under Title
8, Title 14, or Title 15 of the Health Occupations Article.
(3) Information shall be provided to the incarcerated individual describing
medication options used in medication–assisted treatment.
(4) Medication–assisted treatment shall be available to an incarcerated
individual for whom such treatment is determined to be appropriate under this subsection.
(5) Each local correctional facility shall make available at least one
formulation of each FDA–approved full opioid agonist, partial opioid agonist, and
long–acting opioid antagonist used for the treatment of opioid use disorders.
(6) Each pregnant woman identified with an opioid use disorder shall
receive evaluation and be offered medication–assisted treatment as soon as practicable.
(e) Each local correctional facility shall:

HOUSE BILL 1162
(1) following an assessment using clinical guidelines for
medication–assisted treatment:
(i) make medication available by a qualified provider to the
incarcerated individual; or
(ii) begin withdrawal management services prior to administration
of medication;
(2) make available and administer medications for the treatment of opioid
use disorder;
(3) provide behavioral health counseling for incarcerated individuals
diagnosed with opioid use disorder consistent with therapeutic standards for such therapies
in a community setting;
(4) provide access to a health care practitioner who can provide access to
all FDA–approved medications for the treatment of opioid use disorders; and
(5) provide on–premises access to peer recovery specialists.
(f) If an incarcerated individual received medication or medication–assisted
treatment for opioid use disorder immediately preceding or during the incarcerated
individual’s incarceration, a local correctional facility shall continue the treatment after
incarceration or transfer unless:
(1) the incarcerated individual voluntarily discontinues the treatment,
verified through a written agreement that includes a signature; or
(2) a health care practitioner determines that the treatment is no longer
medically appropriate.
(g) Before the release of an incarcerated individual diagnosed with opioid use
disorder under subsection (d) of this section, a local correctional facility shall develop a plan
of reentry that:
(1) includes information regarding postincarceration access to medication
continuity, peer recovery specialists, other supportive therapy, and enrollment in health
insurance plans;
(2) includes any recommended referrals by a health care practitioner to
medication continuity, peer recovery specialists, and other supportive therapy; and
(3) is reviewed and, if needed, revised by a health care practitioner or peer
recovery specialist.

HOUSE BILL 1162 5
(h) The procedures and standards used to determine substance use disorder
diagnosis and treatment of incarcerated individuals are subject to the guidelines and
regulations adopted by the Maryland Department of Health.
[(i) As provided in the State budget, the State shall fund the program of opioid
use disorder screening, evaluation, and treatment of incarcerated individuals as provided
under this section.]
(I) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION, FOR EACH FISCAL
YEAR THE SPECIAL SECRETARY OF OVERDOSE RESPONSE SHALL PROVIDE EACH
COUNTY FUNDING EQUAL TO THE COSTS INCURRED BY THE COUNTY FOR THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF A MEDICATION–ASSISTED TREATMENT PROGRAM IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION DURING THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
(2) THE OFFICE OF OVERDOSE RESPONSE SHALL PROVIDE FUNDING
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FROM:
(I) THE OPIOID RESTITUTION FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER §
7–331 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
(II) ANY MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET FOR
THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING FUNDS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(III) OTHER ELIGIBLE GRANT FUNDING AVAILABLE FOR THE
PURPOSE OF PROVIDING MEDICATION–ASSISTED TREATMENT.
(3) FUNDING UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE
PRIOR FISCAL YEAR SHALL BE REIMBURSED ON RECEIPT OF FINAL ITEMIZED
EXPENSES.
(4) FUNDS DISTRIBUTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE REDUCED
BY THE AMOUNT OF AN AWARD FROM THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME
PREVENTION AND POLICY OR THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, OR A
FEDERAL AWARD FOR THE SAME PURPOSES.
(J) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 30 EACH YEAR, EACH COUNTY SHALL
SUBMIT TO THE OFFICE OF OVERDOSE RESPONSE ALL ESTIMATED ITEMIZED COSTS
FOR THE ANNUAL OPERATION OF THE LOCAL MEDICATION–ASSISTED TREATMENT
PROGRAM IN THE LOCAL DETENTION CENTER FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR AND
THE FINAL ITEMIZED EXPENSES FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR.
(2) IF A COUNTY FAILS TO SUBMIT THE INFORMATION REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION OR INFORMATION REQUESTED BY THE
GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY IN ACCORDANCE WITH

HOUSE BILL 1162
SUBSECTION (L) OF THIS SECTION WHEN DUE, THE OFFICE OF OVERDOSE
RESPONSE SHALL DEDUCT AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO 20% OF ANY FUNDING AWARDED
UNDER SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH 30 DAYS OR PART OF 30 DAYS
AFTER THE DUE DATE THAT THE INFORMATION WAS NOT SUBMITTED.
(K) (1) THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN
APPROPRIATION TO THE OFFICE OF OVERDOSE RESPONSE SUFFICIENT TO
IMPLEMENT SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) AN APPROPRIATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE USED ONLY
TO PROVIDE FUNDING EQUAL TO THE COSTS INCURRED BY A COUNTY FOR THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF A MEDICATION–ASSISTED TREATMENT PROGRAM IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(3) PRIOR TO RECEIVING FUNDING FROM THE OPIOID RESTITUTION
FUND, A COUNTY SHALL DEMONSTRATE AN ATTEMPT TO OBTAIN AT LEAST ONE
GRANT FROM THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH OR THE GOVERNOR’S
OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY FOR THE FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH THE
COUNTY IS REQUESTING REIMBURSEMENT.
[(j)] (L) On or before November 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, the Governor’s
Office of Crime Prevention and Policy shall report data from individual local correctional
facilities to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, on:
(1) the number of incarcerated individuals diagnosed with:
(i) a mental health disorder;
(ii) an opioid use disorder;
(iii) a non–opioid substance use disorder; and
(iv) a dual diagnosis of mental health and substance use disorder;
(2) the number and cost of assessments for incarcerated individuals in local
correctional facilities, including the number of unique incarcerated individuals examined;
(3) the number of incarcerated individuals who were receiving medication
or medication–assisted treatment for opioid use disorder immediately prior to
incarceration;
(4) the type and prevalence of medication or medication–assisted
treatments for opioid use disorder provided;

HOUSE BILL 1162 7
(5) the number of incarcerated individuals diagnosed with opioid use
disorder;
(6) the number of incarcerated individuals for whom medication and
medication–assisted treatment for opioid use disorder was prescribed;
(7) the number of incarcerated individuals for whom medication and
medication–assisted treatment was prescribed and initiated for opioid use disorder;
(8) the number of medications and medication–assisted treatments for
opioid use disorder provided according to each type of medication and medication–assisted
treatment options;
(9) the number of incarcerated individuals who continued to receive the
same medication or medication–assisted treatment for opioid use disorder as the
incarcerated individual received prior to incarceration;
(10) the number of incarcerated individuals who received a different
medication or medication–assisted treatment for opioid use disorder compared to what the
incarcerated individual received prior to incarceration;
(11) the number of incarcerated individuals who initiated treatment with
medication or medication–assisted treatment for opioid use disorder who were not being
treated for opioid use disorder prior to incarceration;
(12) the number of incarcerated individuals who discontinued medication or
medication–assisted treatment for opioid use disorder during incarceration;
(13) [a review and summary of the percent of days, including the average
percent, median percent, mode percent, and interquartile range of percent, for incarcerated
individuals with opioid use disorder receiving medication or medication–assisted treatment
for opioid use disorder as calculated overall and stratified by other factors, such as type of
treatment received] THE AVERAGE NUMBER OF DAYS INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS
RECEIVED MEDICATION–ASSISTED TREATMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION;
(14) the number of incarcerated individuals receiving medication or
medication–assisted treatment for opioid use disorder prior to release;
(15) the number of incarcerated individuals receiving medication or
medication–assisted treatment prior to release for whom the facility had made a prerelease
reentry plan;
(16) a review and summary of practices related to medication and
medication–assisted treatment for opioid use disorder for incarcerated individuals with
opioid use disorder before October 1, 2019;

HOUSE BILL 1162
(17) a review and summary of prerelease planning practices relative to
incarcerated individuals diagnosed with opioid use disorder prior to, and following, October
1, 2019; and
(18) any other information requested by the Maryland Department of
Health OFFICE OF OVERDOSE RESPONSE OR THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME
PREVENTION AND POLICY related to the administration of the provisions under this
section.
[(k)] (M) Any behavioral health assessment, evaluation, treatment
recommendation, or course of treatment shall be reported to the Governor’s Office of Crime
Prevention and Policy and also include any other data necessary to meet reporting
requirements under this section.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–331.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Opioid Restitution Fund.
(b) There is an Opioid Restitution Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to retain the amount of settlement revenues
deposited to the Fund in accordance with subsection (e)(1) of this section.
(d) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
this subtitle.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) all revenues received by the State from any source resulting, directly or
indirectly, from any judgment against, or settlement with, opioid manufacturers, opioid
research associations, or any other person in the opioid industry relating to any claims
made or prosecuted by the State to recover damages for violations of State law; and
(2) the interest earnings of the Fund.
(f) The Fund may be used only to provide funds for the purposes specified in
settlement agreements and judgments relating to claims by the State against opioid
manufacturers, opioid research associations, or any other person in the opioid industry for
violations of State law, including:
(1) programs, services, supports, and resources for evidence–based
substance use disorder prevention, treatment, recovery, or harm reduction;

HOUSE BILL 1162 9
(2) supporting community–based nonprofit recovery organizations that
provide nonclinical substance use recovery support services in the State;
(3) addressing racial disparities in access to prevention, harm reduction,
treatment, and recovery support services;
(4) addressing socioeconomic disparities in access to prevention, harm
reduction, treatment, and recovery support services;
(5) evidence–informed substance use disorder prevention, treatment
recovery, or harm reduction pilot programs or demonstration studies that are not
evidence–based if the Opioid Restitution Fund Advisory Council, established under §
7.5–902 of the Health – General Article:
(i) determines that emerging evidence supports the distribution of
money for the pilot program or that there is a reasonable basis for funding the
demonstration study with the expectation of creating an evidence–based program; and
(ii) approves the use of money for the pilot program or demonstration
study;
(6) evaluations of the effectiveness and outcomes reporting for substance
use disorder abatement infrastructure, programs, services, supports, and resources for
which money from the Fund was used, including evaluations of the impact on access to
harm reduction services or treatment for substance use disorders and the reduction in
drug–related mortality;
(7) operating expenses and personnel costs for investigations, enforcement
actions, and other activities conducted by the Opioids Enforcement Unit within the Office
of the Attorney General that are related to the recovery of funds from opioid–related
judgments or settlements; [and]
(8) the Buprenorphine Training Grant Program established under §
13–5802 of the Health – General Article; AND
(9) FUNDING TO COUNTIES FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF A
MEDICATION–ASSISTED TREATMENT PROGRAM UNDER TITLE 9, SUBTITLE 6 OF THE
CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE.
(g) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.

HOUSE BILL 1162
(h) (1) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the
State budget.
(2) For settlement funds received in accordance with the final distributor
agreement of July 21, 2021, with McKesson Corporation, Amerisource Bergen Corporation,
and Cardinal Health Incorporated, as amended, the Janssen settlement agreement of July
21, 2021, as amended, or any other opioid–related court or administrative judgment or
settlement agreement involving the State and one or more of its political subdivisions:
(i) appropriations from the Fund in the State budget shall be made
in accordance with the allocation and distribution of funds to the State and its political
subdivisions:
1. as agreed on in the State–subdivision agreement of
January 21, 2022, as amended; or
2. required under any other opioid–related court or
administrative judgment or settlement agreement, or any similar agreement reached under
an opioid–related court or administrative judgment or settlement agreement, involving the
State and one or more of its political subdivisions; and
(ii) the Secretary of Health shall establish and administer a grant
program for the distribution of funds to political subdivisions of the State in accordance
with:
1. the State–subdivision agreement of January 21, 2022, as
amended; or
2. the requirements of any other opioid–related court or
administrative judgment or settlement agreement, or any similar agreement reached under
an opioid–related court or administrative judgment or settlement agreement, involving the
State and one or more of its political subdivisions.
(3) The Attorney General shall identify and designate the controlling
version of any agreement or amendment described under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(i) (1) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2025 and 2026.
(ii) Money expended from the Fund for the programs and services
described under subsection (f) of this section is supplemental to and is not intended to take
the place of funding that otherwise would be appropriated for the programs and services.
(2) Except as specified in subsection (f) of this section, money expended
from the Fund may not be used for administrative expenses.
(j) The Governor shall:

HOUSE BILL 1162 11
(1) develop key goals, key objectives, and key performance indicators
relating to substance use treatment and prevention efforts;
(2) subject to subsection (h)(2) of this section, at least twice annually,
consult with the Opioid Restitution Fund Advisory Council to identify recommended
appropriations from the Fund; and
(3) report on or before November 1 each year, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, to the General Assembly on:
(i) an accounting of total funds expended from the Fund in the
immediately preceding fiscal year, by:
1. use;
2. if applicable, jurisdiction; and
3. budget program and subdivision;
(ii) the performance indicators and progress toward achieving the
goals and objectives developed under item (1) of this subsection; and
(iii) the recommended appropriations from the Fund identified in
accordance with item (2) of this subsection.
(k) Beginning on or before October 1, 2025, and each October 1 thereafter, the
Office of the Attorney General shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly on the status of activity of
the Opioids Enforcement Unit, including:
(1) the number of investigations taking place;
(2) the number of lawsuits filed; and
(3) the disposition of lawsuits filed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.